test/src/gt-norm-yamls/proper-smi_gt-norm.yaml
  Propernoun - Rovno: # ACCRA-plc # o-final words are o9 (prevent o:u)
    Rovno+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Rovno 
    Rovno+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Rovno
    Rovno+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc: Rovnov
    Rovno+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine: Rovnon
    Rovno+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Rovnoj
    Rovno+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela: Rovnos
    Rovno+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com: Rovnojn
    Rovno+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Rovno
    Rovno+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ine: Rovnojn
    Rovno+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: Rovnon
    Rovno+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: rovnolasj
    Rovno+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: rovnok
   
  Propernoun - Kåfjord kommune: # ACCRA-LOAN-org
    'Kåfjord kommune+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom': 'Kåfjord kommune'
    'Kåfjord kommune+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Gen': 'Kåfjord kommune'
    'Kåfjord kommune+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Acc': 'Kåfjord kommunev'
    'Kåfjord kommune+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ine': 'Kåfjord kommunen'
    'Kåfjord kommune+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill': 'Kåfjord kommunij'
    'Kåfjord kommune+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela': 'Kåfjord kommunes'
    'Kåfjord kommune+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Com': ['Kåfjord kommunejn', 'Kåfjord kommunijn']
    'Kåfjord kommune+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Nom': []
    'Kåfjord kommune+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Ine': []
    'Kåfjord kommune+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Ess': 'Kåfjord kommunen'
    'Kåfjord kommune+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom': [] 
    'Kåfjord kommune+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom': []
     
  Propernoun - The Norwegian Sami Experience: # ACCRA-LOAN-obj
    'The Norwegian Sami Experience+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom': 'The Norwegian Sami Experience'
    'The Norwegian Sami Experience+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen': 'The Norwegian Sami Experience'
    'The Norwegian Sami Experience+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Acc': 'The Norwegian Sami Experiencev'
    'The Norwegian Sami Experience+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ine': 'The Norwegian Sami Experiencen'
    'The Norwegian Sami Experience+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill': 'The Norwegian Sami Experiencij'
    'The Norwegian Sami Experience+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela': 'The Norwegian Sami Experiences'
    'The Norwegian Sami Experience+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Com': ['The Norwegian Sami Experiencejn', 'The Norwegian Sami Experiencijn']
    'The Norwegian Sami Experience+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Pl+Nom': []
    'The Norwegian Sami Experience+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Pl+Ine': []
    'The Norwegian Sami Experience+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Ess': 'The Norwegian Sami Experiencen'
    'The Norwegian Sami Experience+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom': [] 
    'The Norwegian Sami Experience+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom': []
  
  Propernoun - Amerika: # ACCRA-LOAN-plc
    Amerika+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Amerika 
    Amerika+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Amerika
    Amerika+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc: Amerikav
    Amerika+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine: Amerikan
    Amerika+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Amerikaj
    Amerika+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela: Amerikas
    Amerika+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com: Amerikajn
    Amerika+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: []
    Amerika+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ine: []
    Amerika+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: Amerikan
    Amerika+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: amerikalasj
    Amerika+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: [] 
    
  Propernoun - Signy: # ACCRA-Y-fem, sent to NYSTØ in smj
    Signy+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom: Signy 
    Signy+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Gen: Signya
    Signy+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Acc: Signyav
    Signy+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ine: Signyan
    Signy+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill: Signyaj
    Signy+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela: Signyas
    Signy+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Com: Signyajn
    Signy+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Nom: Signya
    Signy+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Ine: Signyajn
    Signy+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Ess: Signyan
    Signy+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Signy+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
  
  Propernoun - Snowy: # ACCRA-Y-fem, sent to NYSTØ in smj
    Snowy+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Snowy 
    Snowy+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Snowya
    Snowy+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc: Snowyav
    Snowy+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine: Snowyan
    Snowy+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Snowyaj
    Snowy+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela: Snowyas
    Snowy+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com: Snowyajn
    Snowy+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Snowya
    Snowy+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ine: Snowyajn
    Snowy+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: Snowyan
    Snowy+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: snowyalasj
    Snowy+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: snowyak
  
  Propernoun - Saxegaardsgata: # GATA-plc, same as ACCRA
    Saxegaardsgata+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Saxegaardsgata 
    Saxegaardsgata+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Saxegaardsgata
    Saxegaardsgata+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc: Saxegaardsgatav
    Saxegaardsgata+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine: Saxegaardsgatan
    Saxegaardsgata+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Saxegaardsgataj
    Saxegaardsgata+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela: Saxegaardsgatas
    Saxegaardsgata+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com: Saxegaardsgatajn
    Saxegaardsgata+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Saxegaardsgata
    Saxegaardsgata+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ine: Saxegaardsgatajn
    Saxegaardsgata+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: Saxegaardsgatan
    Saxegaardsgata+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: saxegaardsgatalasj
    Saxegaardsgata+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
 
  Propernoun - Kildegata: # GATA-plc
    Kildegata+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Kildegata
    Kildegata+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Kildegata
    Kildegata+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc: Kildegatav
    Kildegata+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine: Kildegatan
    Kildegata+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Kildegataj
    Kildegata+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela: Kildegatas
    Kildegata+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com: Kildegatajn
    Kildegata+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Kildegata
    Kildegata+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ine: Kildegatajn
    Kildegata+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: Kildegatan
    Kildegata+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: kildegatalasj
    Kildegata+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
       
  Propernoun - Stegane: # RONDANE-plc
    Stegane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Stegane 
    Stegane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Stegane
    Stegane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc: Steganev
    Stegane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine: Steganen
    Stegane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Steganij
    Stegane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela: Steganes
    Stegane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com: Steganijn
    Stegane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Stegane
    Stegane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ine: Steganijn
    Stegane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: Steganen
    Stegane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Stegane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    
  Propernoun - Tampere: # RONDANE-SG-plc
    Tampere+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Tampere 
    Tampere+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Tampere
    Tampere+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc: Tamperev
    Tampere+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine: Tamperen
    Tampere+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Tamperij
    Tampere+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela: Tamperes
    Tampere+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com: Tamperijn
    Tampere+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Tampere
    Tampere+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ine: Tamperijn
    Tampere+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: Tamperen
    Tampere+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Tampere+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    
  Propernoun - Azorene: # RONDANE-LOAN
    Azorene+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Azorene 
    Azorene+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: []
    Azorene+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc: []
    Azorene+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine: []
    Azorene+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: []
    Azorene+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela: []
    Azorene+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com: []
    Azorene+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: []
    Azorene+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ine: []
    Azorene+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: []
    Azorene+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Azorene+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: [] 
    
  Propernoun - Enare: # RONDANE-SG-LOAN
    Enare+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Enare 
    Enare+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: []
    Enare+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc: []
    Enare+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine: []
    Enare+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: []
    Enare+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela: []
    Enare+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com: []
    Enare+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: []
    Enare+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ine: []
    Enare+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: []
    Enare+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Enare+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: [] 
    
  Propernoun - Götene: # RONDANE-sur
    Götene+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom: Götene 
    Götene+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen: Götene
    Götene+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Acc: Götenev
    Götene+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ine: Götenen
    Götene+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill: Götenij
    Götene+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela: Götenes
    Götene+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Com: Götenijn
    Götene+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Pl+Nom: Götene
    Götene+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Pl+Ine: Götenijn
    Götene+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Ess: Götenen
    Götene+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Götene+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    
  Propernoun - Office: # RONDANE-obj
    Office+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom: Office 
    Office+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen: Office
    Office+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Acc: Officev
    Office+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ine: Officen
    Office+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill: Officij
    Office+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela: Offices
    Office+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Com: Officijn
    Office+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Pl+Nom: Office
    Office+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Pl+Ine: Officijn
    Office+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Ess: Officen
    Office+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Office+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    
  Propernoun - Picture: # RONDANE-org
    Picture+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom: Picture 
    Picture+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Gen: Picture
    Picture+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Acc: Picturev
    Picture+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ine: Picturen
    Picture+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill: Picturij
    Picture+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela: Pictures
    Picture+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Com: Picturijn
    Picture+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Nom: Picture
    Picture+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Ine: Picturijn
    Picture+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Ess: Picturen
    Picture+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Picture+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    
  Propernoun - Lawrence: # RONDANE-mal 
    Lawrence+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom: Lawrence 
    Lawrence+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen: Lawrence
    Lawrence+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Acc: Lawrencev
    Lawrence+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ine: Lawrencen
    Lawrence+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill: Lawrencij
    Lawrence+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela: Lawrences
    Lawrence+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Com: Lawrencijn
    Lawrence+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Nom: Lawrence
    Lawrence+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Ine: Lawrencijn
    Lawrence+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Ess: Lawrencen
    Lawrence+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Lawrence+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    
  Propernoun - Dyveke: # RONDANE-fem
    Dyveke+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom: Dyveke 
    Dyveke+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Gen: Dyveke
    Dyveke+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Acc: Dyvekev
    Dyveke+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ine: Dyveken
    Dyveke+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill: Dyvekij
    Dyveke+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela: Dyvekes
    Dyveke+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Com: Dyvekijn
    Dyveke+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Nom: Dyveke
    Dyveke+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Ine: Dyvekijn
    Dyveke+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Ess: Dyveken
    Dyveke+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Dyveke+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    
  Propernoun - Sarai: # DUBAI-fem
    Sarai+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom: Sarai 
    Sarai+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Gen: Saraia
    Sarai+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Acc: Saraiav
    Sarai+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ine: Saraian
    Sarai+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill: Saraiaj
    Sarai+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela: Saraias
    Sarai+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Com: Saraiajn
    Sarai+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Nom: Saraia
    Sarai+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Ine: Saraiajn
    Sarai+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Ess: Saraian
    Sarai+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Sarai+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
   
  Propernoun - Hyundai: # DUBAI-obj
    Hyundai+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom: Hyundai 
    Hyundai+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen: Hyundaia
    Hyundai+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Acc: Hyundaiav
    Hyundai+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ine: Hyundaian
    Hyundai+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill: Hyundaiaj
    Hyundai+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela: Hyundaias
    Hyundai+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Com: Hyundaiajn
    Hyundai+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Pl+Nom: Hyundaia
    Hyundai+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Pl+Ine: Hyundaiajn
    Hyundai+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Ess: Hyundaian
    Hyundai+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Hyundai+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    
  Propernoun - Khoi: # DUBAI-org
    Khoi+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom: Khoi 
    Khoi+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Gen: Khoia
    Khoi+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Acc: Khoiav
